Illinois, session 104th, SB642.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-74.4-3.5 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-74.4-3.5)7    Sec. 11-74.4-3.5. Completion dates for redevelopment 8projects.9    (a) Unless otherwise stated in this Section, the estimated 10dates of completion of the redevelopment project and 11retirement of obligations issued to finance redevelopment 12project costs (including refunding bonds under Section 1311-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the year in 14which the payment to the municipal treasurer, as provided in 15subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act, is to be made 16with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 23rd calendar 17year after the year in which the ordinance approving the 18redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance was 19adopted on or after January 15, 1981.20    (a-5) If the redevelopment project area is located within 21a transit facility improvement area established pursuant to 22Section 11-74.4-3, the estimated dates of completion of the 23redevelopment project and retirement of obligations issued to   SB0642 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1finance redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds 2under Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of 3the year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer, as 4provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act, 5is to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 635th calendar year after the year in which the ordinance 7approving the redevelopment project area was adopted. 8    (a-7) A municipality may adopt tax increment financing for 9a redevelopment project area located in a transit facility 10improvement area that also includes real property located 11within an existing redevelopment project area established 12prior to August 12, 2016 (the effective date of Public Act 1399-792). In such case: (i) the provisions of this Division 14shall apply with respect to the previously established 15redevelopment project area until the municipality adopts, as 16required in accordance with applicable provisions of this 17Division, an ordinance dissolving the special tax allocation 18fund for such redevelopment project area and terminating the 19designation of such redevelopment project area as a 20redevelopment project area; and (ii) after the effective date 21of the ordinance described in (i), the provisions of this 22Division shall apply with respect to the subsequently 23established redevelopment project area located in a transit 24facility improvement area. 25    (b) The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 26project and retirement of obligations issued to finance   SB0642 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 2Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the 3year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 4provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 5to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 32nd 6calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 7the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 8was adopted on September 9, 1999 by the Village of Downs. 9    The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 10project and retirement of obligations issued to finance 11redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 12Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the 13year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 14provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 15to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 33rd 16calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 17the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 18was adopted on May 20, 1985 by the Village of Wheeling.19    The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 20project and retirement of obligations issued to finance 21redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 22Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the 23year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 24provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 25to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 28th 26calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving   SB0642 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 2was adopted on October 12, 1989 by the City of Lawrenceville. 3    (b-5) The estimated dates of completion of the 4redevelopment project and retirement of obligations issued to 5finance redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds 6under Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of 7the year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 8provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 9to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 32nd 10calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 11the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 12was adopted on April 19, 2004 by the Village of Tremont. 13    (c) The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 14project and retirement of obligations issued to finance 15redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 16Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the 17year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 18provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 19to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 35th 20calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 21the redevelopment project area was adopted:22        (1) If the ordinance was adopted before January 15, 23    1981.24        (2) If the ordinance was adopted in December 1983, 25    April 1984, July 1985, or December 1989.26        (3) If the ordinance was adopted in December 1987 and   SB0642 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    the redevelopment project is located within one mile of 2    Midway Airport.3        (4) If the ordinance was adopted before January 1, 4    1987 by a municipality in Mason County.5        (5) If the municipality is subject to the Local 6    Government Financial Planning and Supervision Act or the 7    Financially Distressed City Law.8        (6) If the ordinance was adopted in December 1984 by 9    the Village of Rosemont.10        (7) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 11    by a municipality located in Clinton County for which at 12    least $250,000 of tax increment bonds were authorized on 13    June 17, 1997, or if the ordinance was adopted on December 14    31, 1986 by a municipality with a population in 1990 of 15    less than 3,600 that is located in a county with a 16    population in 1990 of less than 34,000 and for which at 17    least $250,000 of tax increment bonds were authorized on 18    June 17, 1997.19        (8) If the ordinance was adopted on October 5, 1982 by 20    the City of Kankakee, or if the ordinance was adopted on 21    December 29, 1986 by East St. Louis.22        (9) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 1991 23    by the Village of Sauget.24        (10) If the ordinance was adopted on February 11, 1985 25    by the City of Rock Island.26        (11) If the ordinance was adopted before December 18,   SB0642 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    1986 by the City of Moline.2        (12) If the ordinance was adopted in September 1988 by 3    Sauk Village.4        (13) If the ordinance was adopted in October 1993 by 5    Sauk Village.6        (14) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 7    by the City of Galva.8        (15) If the ordinance was adopted in March 1991 by the 9    City of Centreville.10        (16) If the ordinance was adopted on January 23, 1991 11    by the City of East St. Louis.12        (17) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 13    by the City of Aledo.14        (18) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1990 15    by the City of Clinton.16        (19) If the ordinance was adopted on September 6, 1994 17    by the City of Freeport.18        (20) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 19    by the City of Tuscola.20        (21) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986 21    by the City of Sparta.22        (22) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986 23    by the City of Beardstown.24        (23) If the ordinance was adopted on April 27, 1981, 25    October 21, 1985, or December 30, 1986 by the City of 26    Belleville.  SB0642 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1        (24) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 2    by the City of Collinsville.3        (25) If the ordinance was adopted on September 14, 4    1994 by the City of Alton.5        (26) If the ordinance was adopted on November 11, 1996 6    by the City of Lexington.7        (27) If the ordinance was adopted on November 5, 1984 8    by the City of LeRoy.9        (28) If the ordinance was adopted on April 3, 1991 or 10    June 3, 1992 by the City of Markham.11        (29) If the ordinance was adopted on November 11, 1986 12    by the City of Pekin.13        (30) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 1981 14    by the City of Champaign.15        (31) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 1986 16    by the City of Urbana.17        (32) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 1986 18    by the Village of Heyworth.19        (33) If the ordinance was adopted on February 24, 1992 20    by the Village of Heyworth.21        (34) If the ordinance was adopted on March 16, 1995 by 22    the Village of Heyworth.23        (35) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986 24    by the Town of Cicero.25        (36) If the ordinance was adopted on December 30, 1986 26    by the City of Effingham.  SB0642 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1        (37) If the ordinance was adopted on May 9, 1991 by the 2    Village of Tilton.3        (38) If the ordinance was adopted on October 20, 1986 4    by the City of Elmhurst.5        (39) If the ordinance was adopted on January 19, 1988 6    by the City of Waukegan.7        (40) If the ordinance was adopted on September 21, 8    1998 by the City of Waukegan.9        (41) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 10    by the City of Sullivan.11        (42) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1991 12    by the City of Sullivan.13        (43) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 14    by the City of Oglesby.15        (44) If the ordinance was adopted on July 28, 1987 by 16    the City of Marion.17        (45) If the ordinance was adopted on April 23, 1990 by 18    the City of Marion.19        (46) If the ordinance was adopted on August 20, 1985 20    by the Village of Mount Prospect.21        (47) If the ordinance was adopted on February 2, 1998 22    by the Village of Woodhull.23        (48) If the ordinance was adopted on April 20, 1993 by 24    the Village of Princeville.25        (49) If the ordinance was adopted on July 1, 1986 by 26    the City of Granite City.  SB0642 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1        (50) If the ordinance was adopted on February 2, 1989 2    by the Village of Lombard.3        (51) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 4    by the Village of Gardner.5        (52) If the ordinance was adopted on July 14, 1999 by 6    the Village of Paw Paw.7        (53) If the ordinance was adopted on November 17, 1986 8    by the Village of Franklin Park.9        (54) If the ordinance was adopted on November 20, 1989 10    by the Village of South Holland.11        (55) If the ordinance was adopted on July 14, 1992 by 12    the Village of Riverdale.13        (56) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 14    by the City of Galesburg.15        (57) If the ordinance was adopted on April 1, 1985 by 16    the City of Galesburg.17        (58) If the ordinance was adopted on May 21, 1990 by 18    the City of West Chicago.19        (59) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 1986 20    by the City of Oak Forest.21        (60) If the ordinance was adopted in 1999 by the City 22    of Villa Grove.23        (61) If the ordinance was adopted on January 13, 1987 24    by the Village of Mt. Zion.25        (62) If the ordinance was adopted on December 30, 1986 26    by the Village of Manteno.  SB0642 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1        (63) If the ordinance was adopted on April 3, 1989 by 2    the City of Chicago Heights.3        (64) If the ordinance was adopted on January 6, 1999 4    by the Village of Rosemont.5        (65) If the ordinance was adopted on December 19, 2000 6    by the Village of Stone Park.7        (66) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 8    by the City of DeKalb.9        (67) If the ordinance was adopted on December 2, 1986 10    by the City of Aurora. 11        (68) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 12    by the Village of Milan.13        (69) If the ordinance was adopted on September 8, 1994 14    by the City of West Frankfort.15        (70) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986 16    by the Village of Libertyville.17        (71) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 18    by the Village of Hoffman Estates. 19        (72) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 20    1986 by the Village of Sherman. 21        (73) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 1986 22    by the City of Macomb.23        (74) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by 24    the City of East Peoria to create the West Washington 25    Street TIF.26        (75) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by   SB0642 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    the City of East Peoria to create the Camp Street TIF. 2        (76) If the ordinance was adopted on August 7, 2000 by 3    the City of Des Plaines.4        (77) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 5    by the City of Washington to create the Washington Square 6    TIF #2.7        (78) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 8    by the City of Morris. 9        (79) If the ordinance was adopted on July 6, 1998 by 10    the Village of Steeleville.11        (80) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 12    by the City of Pontiac to create TIF I (the Main St TIF).13        (81) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 14    by the City of Pontiac to create TIF II (the Interstate 15    TIF). 16        (82) If the ordinance was adopted on November 6, 2002 17    by the City of Chicago to create the Madden/Wells TIF 18    District. 19        (83) If the ordinance was adopted on November 4, 1998 20    by the City of Chicago to create the Roosevelt/Racine TIF 21    District. 22        (84) If the ordinance was adopted on June 10, 1998 by 23    the City of Chicago to create the Stony Island 24    Commercial/Burnside Industrial Corridors TIF District. 25        (85) If the ordinance was adopted on November 29, 1989 26    by the City of Chicago to create the Englewood Mall TIF   SB0642 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    District.2        (86) If the ordinance was adopted on December 27, 1986 3    by the City of Mendota. 4        (87) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 5    by the Village of Cahokia.6        (88) If the ordinance was adopted on September 20, 7    1999 by the City of Belleville.8        (89) If the ordinance was adopted on December 30, 1986 9    by the Village of Bellevue to create the Bellevue TIF 10    District 1.11        (90) If the ordinance was adopted on December 13, 1993 12    by the Village of Crete.13        (91) If the ordinance was adopted on February 12, 2001 14    by the Village of Crete.15        (92) If the ordinance was adopted on April 23, 2001 by 16    the Village of Crete.17        (93) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 1986 18    by the City of Champaign. 19        (94) If the ordinance was adopted on December 20, 1986 20    by the City of Charleston. 21        (95) If the ordinance was adopted on June 6, 1989 by 22    the Village of Romeoville. 23        (96) If the ordinance was adopted on October 14, 1993 24    and amended on August 2, 2010 by the City of Venice. 25        (97) If the ordinance was adopted on June 1, 1994 by 26    the City of Markham.   SB0642 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1        (98) If the ordinance was adopted on May 19, 1998 by 2    the Village of Bensenville. 3        (99) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 1987 4    by the City of Dixon. 5        (100) If the ordinance was adopted on December 20, 6    1988 by the Village of Lansing. 7        (101) If the ordinance was adopted on October 27, 1998 8    by the City of Moline. 9        (102) If the ordinance was adopted on May 21, 1991 by 10    the Village of Glenwood. 11        (103) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 1992 12    by the City of East Peoria. 13        (104) If the ordinance was adopted on December 14, 14    1998 by the City of Carlyle.15        (105) If the ordinance was adopted on May 17, 2000, as 16    subsequently amended, by the City of Chicago to create the 17    Midwest Redevelopment TIF District. 18        (106) If the ordinance was adopted on September 13, 19    1989 by the City of Chicago to create the Michigan/Cermak 20    Area TIF District. 21        (107) If the ordinance was adopted on March 30, 1992 22    by the Village of Ohio. 23        (108) If the ordinance was adopted on July 6, 1998 by 24    the Village of Orangeville.25        (109) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 26    1997 by the Village of Germantown.   SB0642 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1        (110) If the ordinance was adopted on April 28, 2003 2    by Gibson City. 3        (111) If the ordinance was adopted on December 18, 4    1990 by the Village of Washington Park, but only after the 5    Village of Washington Park becomes compliant with the 6    reporting requirements under subsection (d) of Section 7    11-74.4-5, and after the State Comptroller's certification 8    of such compliance. 9        (112) If the ordinance was adopted on February 28, 10    2000 by the City of Harvey.11        (113) If the ordinance was adopted on January 11, 1991 12    by the City of Chicago to create the Read/Dunning TIF 13    District. 14        (114) If the ordinance was adopted on July 24, 1991 by 15    the City of Chicago to create the Sanitary and Ship Canal 16    TIF District. 17        (115) If the ordinance was adopted on December 4, 2007 18    by the City of Naperville. 19        (116) If the ordinance was adopted on July 1, 2002 by 20    the Village of Arlington Heights. 21        (117) If the ordinance was adopted on February 11, 22    1991 by the Village of Machesney Park. 23        (118) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 24    1993 by the City of Ottawa. 25        (119) If the ordinance was adopted on June 4, 1991 by 26    the Village of Lansing.   SB0642 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1        (120) If the ordinance was adopted on February 10, 2    2004 by the Village of Fox Lake.3        (121) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 4    1992 by the City of Fairfield.5        (122) If the ordinance was adopted on February 10, 6    1992 by the City of Mt. Sterling. 7        (123) If the ordinance was adopted on March 15, 2004 8    by the City of Batavia. 9        (124) If the ordinance was adopted on March 18, 2002 10    by the Village of Lake Zurich.11        (125) If the ordinance was adopted on September 23, 12    1997 by the City of Granite City. 13        (126) If the ordinance was adopted on May 8, 2013 by 14    the Village of Rosemont to create the Higgins Road/River 15    Road TIF District No. 6. 16        (127) If the ordinance was adopted on November 22, 17    1993 by the City of Arcola. 18        (128) If the ordinance was adopted on September 7, 19    2004 by the City of Arcola. 20        (129) If the ordinance was adopted on November 29, 21    1999 by the City of Paris. 22        (130) If the ordinance was adopted on September 20, 23    1994 by the City of Ottawa to create the U.S. Route 6 East 24    Ottawa TIF. 25        (131) If the ordinance was adopted on May 2, 2002 by 26    the Village of Crestwood.   SB0642 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1        (132) If the ordinance was adopted on October 27, 1992 2    by the City of Blue Island. 3        (133) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 4    1993 by the City of Lacon. 5        (134) If the ordinance was adopted on May 4, 1998 by 6    the Village of Bradford. 7        (135) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by 8    the City of Oak Forest. 9        (136) If the ordinance was adopted on November 16, 10    1992 by the City of Pinckneyville. 11        (137) If the ordinance was adopted on March 1, 2001 by 12    the Village of South Jacksonville. 13        (138) If the ordinance was adopted on February 26, 14    1992 by the City of Chicago to create the Stockyards 15    Southeast Quadrant TIF District.16        (139) If the ordinance was adopted on January 25, 1993 17    by the City of LaSalle.18        (140) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 19    1997 by the Village of Dieterich. 20        (141) If the ordinance was adopted on February 10, 21    2016 by the Village of Rosemont to create the 22    Balmoral/Pearl TIF No. 8 Tax Increment Financing 23    Redevelopment Project Area. 24        (142) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by 25    the City of Oak Forest.26        (143) If the ordinance was adopted on January 31, 1995   SB0642 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    by the Village of Milledgeville. 2        (144) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1996 3    by the Village of Pearl City. 4        (145) If the ordinance was adopted on December 21, 5    1994 by the City of Calumet City.6        (146) If the ordinance was adopted on May 5, 2003 by 7    the Town of Normal. 8        (147) If the ordinance was adopted on June 2, 1998 by 9    the City of Litchfield. 10        (148) If the ordinance was adopted on October 23, 1995 11    by the City of Marion. 12        (149) If the ordinance was adopted on May 24, 2001 by 13    the Village of Hanover Park. 14        (150) If the ordinance was adopted on May 30, 1995 by 15    the Village of Dalzell. 16        (151) If the ordinance was adopted on April 15, 1997 17    by the City of Edwardsville. 18        (152) If the ordinance was adopted on September 5, 19    1995 by the City of Granite City. 20        (153) If the ordinance was adopted on June 21, 1999 by 21    the Village of Table Grove. 22        (154) If the ordinance was adopted on February 23, 23    1995 by the City of Springfield. 24        (155) If the ordinance was adopted on August 11, 1999 25    by the City of Monmouth. 26        (156) If the ordinance was adopted on December 26,   SB0642 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    1995 by the Village of Posen. 2        (157) If the ordinance was adopted on July 1, 1995 by 3    the Village of Caseyville. 4        (158) If the ordinance was adopted on January 30, 1996 5    by the City of Madison. 6        (159) If the ordinance was adopted on February 2, 1996 7    by the Village of Hartford. 8        (160) If the ordinance was adopted on July 2, 1996 by 9    the Village of Manlius. 10        (161) If the ordinance was adopted on March 21, 2000 11    by the City of Hoopeston.12        (162) If the ordinance was adopted on March 22, 2005 13    by the City of Hoopeston.14        (163) If the ordinance was adopted on July 10, 1996 by 15    the City of Chicago to create the Goose Island TIF 16    District.17        (164) If the ordinance was adopted on December 11, 18    1996 by the City of Chicago to create the Bryn 19    Mawr/Broadway TIF District.20        (165) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 21    1995 by the City of Chicago to create the 95th/Western TIF 22    District.23        (166) If the ordinance was adopted on October 7, 1998 24    by the City of Chicago to create the 71st and Stony Island 25    TIF District.26        (167) If the ordinance was adopted on April 19, 1995   SB0642 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    by the Village of North Utica.2        (168) If the ordinance was adopted on April 22, 1996 3    by the City of LaSalle.4        (169) If the ordinance was adopted on June 9, 2008 by 5    the City of Country Club Hills. 6        (170) If the ordinance was adopted on July 3, 1996 by 7    the Village of Phoenix.8        (171) If the ordinance was adopted on May 19, 1997 by 9    the Village of Swansea.10        (172) If the ordinance was adopted on August 13, 2001 11    by the Village of Saunemin.12        (173) If the ordinance was adopted on January 10, 2005 13    by the Village of Romeoville. 14        (174) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 1997 15    by the City of Berwyn for the South Berwyn Corridor Tax 16    Increment Financing District.17        (175) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 1997 18    by the City of Berwyn for the Roosevelt Road Tax Increment 19    Financing District.20        (176) If the ordinance was adopted on May 3, 2001 by 21    the Village of Hanover Park for the Village Center Tax 22    Increment Financing Redevelopment Project Area (TIF # 3).23        (177) If the ordinance was adopted on January 1, 1996 24    by the City of Savanna. 25        (178) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 2002 26    by the Village of Okawville.  SB0642 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1        (179) If the ordinance was adopted on October 4, 1999 2    by the City of Vandalia.3        (180) If the ordinance was adopted on June 16, 2003 by 4    the City of Rushville.5        (181) If the ordinance was adopted on December 7, 1998 6    by the City of Quincy for the Central Business District 7    West Tax Increment Redevelopment Project Area. 8        (182) If the ordinance was adopted on March 27, 1997 9    by the Village of Maywood approving the Roosevelt Road TIF 10    District. 11        (183) If the ordinance was adopted on March 27, 1997 12    by the Village of Maywood approving the Madison 13    Street/Fifth Avenue TIF District. 14        (184) If the ordinance was adopted on November 10, 15    1997 by the Village of Park Forest. 16        (185) If the ordinance was adopted on July 30, 1997 by 17    the City of Chicago to create the Near North TIF district. 18        (186) If the ordinance was adopted on December 1, 2000 19    by the Village of Mahomet. 20        (187) If the ordinance was adopted on June 16, 1999 by 21    the Village of Washburn. 22        (188) If the ordinance was adopted on August 19, 1998 23    by the Village of New Berlin. 24        (189) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 2002 25    by the City of Highwood. 26        (190) If the ordinance was adopted on June 1, 1997 by   SB0642 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    the City of Flora. 2        (191) If the ordinance was adopted on August 17, 1999 3    by the City of Ottawa. 4        (192) If the ordinance was adopted on June 13, 2005 by 5    the City of Mount Carroll. 6        (193) If the ordinance was adopted on March 25, 2008 7    by the Village of Elizabeth. 8        (194) If the ordinance was adopted on February 22, 9    2000 by the City of Mount Pulaski. 10        (195) If the ordinance was adopted on November 21, 11    2000 by the City of Effingham.12        (196) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 2003 13    by the City of Effingham. 14        (197) If the ordinance was adopted on February 4, 2008 15    by the City of Polo. 16        (198) If the ordinance was adopted on August 17, 2005 17    by the Village of Bellwood to create the Park Place TIF.18        (199) If the ordinance was adopted on July 16, 2014 by 19    the Village of Bellwood to create the North-2014 TIF.20        (200) If the ordinance was adopted on July 16, 2014 by 21    the Village of Bellwood to create the South-2014 TIF.22        (201) If the ordinance was adopted on July 16, 2014 by 23    the Village of Bellwood to create the Central Metro-2014 24    TIF.25        (202) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 26    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison   SB0642 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    Creek "A" (Southwest)-2014 TIF.2        (203) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 3    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison 4    Creek "B" (Northwest)-2014 TIF.5        (204) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 6    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison 7    Creek "C" (Northeast)-2014 TIF.8        (205) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 9    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison 10    Creek "D" (Southeast)-2014 TIF.11        (206) If the ordinance was adopted on June 26, 2007 by 12    the City of Peoria.13        (207) If the ordinance was adopted on October 28, 2008 14    by the City of Peoria. 15        (208) If the ordinance was adopted on April 4, 2000 by 16    the City of Joliet to create the Joliet City Center TIF 17    District. 18        (209) If the ordinance was adopted on July 8, 1998 by 19    the City of Chicago to create the 43rd/Cottage Grove TIF 20    district. 21        (210) If the ordinance was adopted on July 8, 1998 by 22    the City of Chicago to create the 79th Street Corridor TIF 23    district. 24        (211) If the ordinance was adopted on November 4, 1998 25    by the City of Chicago to create the Bronzeville TIF 26    district.   SB0642 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1        (212) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1998 2    by the City of Chicago to create the Homan/Arthington TIF 3    district. 4        (213) If the ordinance was adopted on December 8, 1998 5    by the Village of Plainfield. 6        (214) If the ordinance was adopted on July 17, 2000 by 7    the Village of Homer.8        (215) If the ordinance was adopted on December 27, 9    2006 by the City of Greenville.10        (216) If the ordinance was adopted on June 10, 1998 by 11    the City of Chicago to create the Kinzie Industrial TIF 12    district.13        (217) If the ordinance was adopted on December 2, 1998 14    by the City of Chicago to create the Northwest Industrial 15    TIF district.16        (218) If the ordinance was adopted on June 10, 1998 by 17    the City of Chicago to create the Pilsen Industrial TIF 18    district.19        (219) If the ordinance was adopted on January 14, 1997 20    by the City of Chicago to create the 35th/Halsted TIF 21    district.22        (220) If the ordinance was adopted on June 9, 1999 by 23    the City of Chicago to create the Pulaski Corridor TIF 24    district. 25        (221) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 26    1997 by the City of Springfield to create the Enos Park   SB0642 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    Neighborhood TIF District. 2        (222) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1998 3    by the City of Chicago to create the Roosevelt/Cicero 4    redevelopment project area. 5        (223) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1998 6    by the City of Chicago to create the Western/Ogden 7    redevelopment project area. 8        (224) If the ordinance was adopted on July 21, 1999 by 9    the City of Chicago to create the 24th/Michigan Avenue 10    redevelopment project area. 11        (225) If the ordinance was adopted on January 20, 1999 12    by the City of Chicago to create the Woodlawn 13    redevelopment project area. 14        (226) If the ordinance was adopted on July 7, 1999 by 15    the City of Chicago to create the Clark/Montrose 16    redevelopment project area. 17        (227) If the ordinance was adopted on November 4, 2003 18    by the City of Madison to create the Rivers Edge 19    redevelopment project area. 20        (228) If the ordinance was adopted on August 12, 2003 21    by the City of Madison to create the Caine Street 22    redevelopment project area. 23        (229) If the ordinance was adopted on March 7, 2000 by 24    the City of Madison to create the East Madison TIF. 25        (230) If the ordinance was adopted on August 3, 2001 26    by the Village of Aviston.   SB0642 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1        (231) If the ordinance was adopted on August 22, 2011 2    by the Village of Warren. 3        (232) If the ordinance was adopted on April 8, 1999 by 4    the City of Farmer City.5        (233) If the ordinance was adopted on August 4, 1999 6    by the Village of Fairmont City.7        (234) If the ordinance was adopted on October 2, 1999 8    by the Village of Fairmont City. 9        (235) If the ordinance was adopted December 16, 1999 10    by the City of Springfield. 11        (236) If the ordinance was adopted on December 13, 12    1999 by the Village of Palatine to create the Village of 13    Palatine Downtown Area TIF District.14        (237) If the ordinance was adopted on September 29, 15    1999 by the City of Chicago to create the 111th/Kedzie 16    redevelopment project area.17        (238) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 18    1998 by the City of Chicago to create the Canal/Congress 19    redevelopment project area.20        (239) If the ordinance was adopted on July 7, 1999 by 21    the City of Chicago to create the Galewood/Armitage 22    Industrial redevelopment project area.23        (240) If the ordinance was adopted on September 29, 24    1999 by the City of Chicago to create the Madison/Austin 25    Corridor redevelopment project area.26        (241) If the ordinance was adopted on April 12, 2000   SB0642 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    by the City of Chicago to create the South Chicago 2    redevelopment project area. 3        (242) If the ordinance was adopted on January 9, 2002 4    by the Village of Elkhart. 5        (243) If the ordinance was adopted on May 23, 2000 by 6    the City of Robinson to create the West Robinson 7    Industrial redevelopment project area. 8        (244) If the ordinance was adopted on October 9, 2001 9    by the City of Robinson to create the Downtown Robinson 10    redevelopment project area. 11        (245) If the ordinance was adopted on September 19, 12    2000 by the Village of Valmeyer. 13        (246) If the ordinance was adopted on April 15, 2002 14    by the City of McHenry to create the Downtown TIF 15    district. 16        (247) If the ordinance was adopted on February 15, 17    1999 by the Village of Channahon. 18        (248) If the ordinance was adopted on December 19, 19    2000 by the City of Peoria. 20        (249) If the ordinance was adopted on July 24, 2000 by 21    the City of Rock Island to create the North 11th Street 22    redevelopment project area.23        (250) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 2002 24    by the City of Champaign to create the North Campustown 25    TIF. 26        (251) If the ordinance was adopted on November 20,   SB0642 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    2000 by the Village of Evergreen Park. 2        (252) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 3    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the 4    Fullerton/Milwaukee redevelopment project area. 5        (253) If the ordinance was adopted on October 23, 2006 6    by the Village of Bourbonnais to create the Bourbonnais 7    Industrial Park Conservation Area.8        (254) If the ordinance was adopted on February 22, 9    2000 by the City of Geneva to create the East State Street 10    redevelopment project area.11        (255) If the ordinance was adopted on February 6, 2001 12    by the Village of Downers Grove to create the Ogden Avenue 13    redevelopment project area.14        (256) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2001 by 15    the City of Chicago to create the Division/Homan 16    redevelopment project area.17        (257) If the ordinance was adopted on May 17, 2000 by 18    the City of Chicago to create the 63rd/Pulaski 19    redevelopment project area.20        (258) If the ordinance was adopted on March 10, 1999 21    by the City of Chicago to create the Greater Southwest 22    Industrial (East) redevelopment project area.23        (259) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 24    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Lawrence/Kedzie 25    redevelopment project area.26        (260) If the ordinance was adopted on November 3, 1999   SB0642 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    by the City of Chicago to create the Lincoln Avenue 2    redevelopment project area.3        (261) If the ordinance was adopted on September 3, 4    2015 by the Village of Fox River Grove to create the 5    Downtown TIF #2 redevelopment project area. 6        (262) If the ordinance was adopted on October 16, 2000 7    by the Village of Franklin Park to create the Downtown 8    Franklin Avenue redevelopment project area.9        (263) If the ordinance was adopted on September 8, 10    2003 by the City of Jacksonville to create the Downtown 11    Redevelopment Project Area.12        (264) If the ordinance was adopted on August 13, 2002 13    by the City of Prophetstown to create the Redevelopment 14    Project Area No. 1.15        (265) If the ordinance was adopted on August 29, 2006 16    by the City of Ottawa to create the Ottawa Dayton 17    Industrial TIF District.18        (266) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2006 by 19    the City of Ottawa to create the Ottawa Canal TIF 20    District.21        (267) If the ordinance was adopted on March 5, 2001 by 22    the City of Salem to create the TIF No 2 - Redevelopment 23    Area.24        (268) If the ordinance was adopted on January 23, 2002 25    by the Village of Malta to create the Harkness Property 26    redevelopment project area.  SB0642 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1        (269) If the ordinance was adopted on June 16, 2008 by 2    the City of Highland to create TIF #1.3        (270) If the ordinance was adopted on January 3, 2012 4    by the City of Highland to create TIF #2.5        (271) If the ordinance was adopted on January 1, 2000 6    by the City of Chicago to create the Belmont/Central 7    redevelopment project area.8        (272) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2001 by 9    the City of Chicago to create the Englewood Neighborhood 10    redevelopment project area.11        (273) If the ordinance was adopted on December 13, 12    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Lake Calumet Area 13    Industrial redevelopment project area.14        (274) If the ordinance was adopted on October 15, 2001 15    by the City of Des Plaines to create TIF No. 6 Mannheim 16    Higgins Road. 17        (275) If the ordinance was adopted on October 22, 2001 18    by the City of Sullivan to create TIF District III. 19        (276) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 20    2013 by the City of Oak Forest to create the City of Oak 21    Forest Cicero Avenue Tax Increment Financing District 22    Redevelopment Project Area TIF District #6. 23        (277) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 24    2003 by the City of Knoxville.25        (278) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 26    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Peterson/Pulaski   SB0642 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    redevelopment project area.2        (279) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 3    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Central West 4    redevelopment project area.5        (280) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2001 by 6    the City of Chicago to create the Lawrence/Broadway 7    redevelopment project area.8        (281) If the ordinance was adopted on March 18, 2002 9    by the City of St. Charles for the First Street District 10    #4.11        (282) If the ordinance was adopted on April 6, 2001 by 12    the Village of Melrose Park to create the Seniors First 13    TIF.14        (283) If the ordinance was adopted on April 6, 2001 by 15    the Village of Melrose Park to create the Zenith Opus TIF. 16        (284) If the ordinance was adopted on January 16, 2002 17    by the City of Chicago to create the Roseland/Michigan 18    redevelopment project area.19        (285) If the ordinance was adopted on February 27, 20    2002 by the City of Chicago to create the Chicago/Central 21    Park redevelopment project area.22        (286) If the ordinance was adopted on July 31, 2002 by 23    the City of Chicago to create the Avalon Park/South Shore 24    redevelopment project area.25        (287) If the ordinance was adopted on November 13, 26    2002 by the City of Chicago to create the Commercial   SB0642 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    Avenue redevelopment project area.2        (288) If the ordinance was adopted on December 1, 2003 3    by the Village of Millstadt to create Millstadt TIF 4    District #1.5        (289) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 6    2003 by the City of Mattoon to create the Midtown Mattoon 7    redevelopment project area.8        (290) If the ordinance was adopted on January 21, 2003 9    by the City of Sterling to create the Rock River 10    Redevelopment. 11    (d) For redevelopment project areas for which bonds were 12issued before July 29, 1991, or for which contracts were 13entered into before June 1, 1988, in connection with a 14redevelopment project in the area within the State Sales Tax 15Boundary, the estimated dates of completion of the 16redevelopment project and retirement of obligations to finance 17redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 18Section 11-74.4-7) may be extended by municipal ordinance to 19December 31, 2013. The termination procedures of subsection 20(b) of Section 11-74.4-8 are not required for these 21redevelopment project areas in 2009 but are required in 2013. 22The extension allowed by Public Act 87-1272 shall not apply to 23real property tax increment allocation financing under Section 2411-74.4-8.25    (e) Those dates, for purposes of real property tax 26increment allocation financing pursuant to Section 11-74.4-8   SB0642 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1only, shall be not more than 35 years for redevelopment 2project areas that were adopted on or after December 16, 1986 3and for which at least $8 million worth of municipal bonds were 4authorized on or after December 19, 1989 but before January 1, 51990; provided that the municipality elects to extend the life 6of the redevelopment project area to 35 years by the adoption 7of an ordinance after at least 14 but not more than 30 days' 8written notice to the taxing bodies, that would otherwise 9constitute the joint review board for the redevelopment 10project area, before the adoption of the ordinance.11    (f) Those dates, for purposes of real property tax 12increment allocation financing pursuant to Section 11-74.4-8 13only, shall be not more than 35 years for redevelopment 14project areas that were established on or after December 1, 151981 but before January 1, 1982 and for which at least 16$1,500,000 worth of tax increment revenue bonds were 17authorized on or after September 30, 1990 but before July 1, 181991; provided that the municipality elects to extend the life 19of the redevelopment project area to 35 years by the adoption 20of an ordinance after at least 14 but not more than 30 days' 21written notice to the taxing bodies, that would otherwise 22constitute the joint review board for the redevelopment 23project area, before the adoption of the ordinance.24    (f-1) (Blank). 25    (f-2) (Blank). 26    (f-3) (Blank).   SB0642 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    (f-5) Those dates, for purposes of real property tax 2increment allocation financing pursuant to Section 11-74.4-8 3only, shall be not more than 47 years for redevelopment 4project areas listed in this subsection; provided that (i) the 5municipality adopts an ordinance extending the life of the 6redevelopment project area to 47 years and (ii) the 7municipality provides notice to the taxing bodies that would 8otherwise constitute the joint review board for the 9redevelopment project area not more than 30 and not less than 1014 days prior to the adoption of that ordinance: 11        (1) If the redevelopment project area was established 12    on December 29, 1981 by the City of Springfield. 13        (2) If the redevelopment project area was established 14    on December 29, 1986 by the City of Morris and that is 15    known as the Morris TIF District 1. 16        (3) If the redevelopment project area was established 17    on December 31, 1986 by the Village of Cahokia. 18        (4) If the redevelopment project area was established 19    on December 20, 1986 by the City of Charleston. 20        (5) If the redevelopment project area was established 21    on December 23, 1986 by the City of Beardstown. 22        (6) If the redevelopment project area was established 23    on December 23, 1986 by the Town of Cicero. 24        (7) If the redevelopment project area was established 25    on December 29, 1986 by the City of East St. Louis. 26        (8) If the redevelopment project area was established   SB0642 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    on January 23, 1991 by the City of East St. Louis. 2        (9) If the redevelopment project area was established 3    on December 29, 1986 by the Village of Gardner. 4        (10) If the redevelopment project area was established 5    on June 11, 2002 by the City of East Peoria to create the 6    West Washington Street TIF. 7        (11) If the redevelopment project area was established 8    on December 22, 1986 by the City of Washington creating 9    the Washington Square TIF #2.10        (12) If the redevelopment project area was established 11    on November 11, 1986 by the City of Pekin.12        (13) If the redevelopment project area was established 13    on December 30, 1986 by the City of Belleville. 14        (14) If the ordinance was adopted on April 3, 1989 by 15    the City of Chicago Heights. 16        (15) If the redevelopment project area was established 17    on December 29, 1986 by the City of Pontiac to create TIF I 18    (the Main St TIF). 19        (16) If the redevelopment project area was established 20    on December 29, 1986 by the City of Pontiac to create TIF 21    II (the Interstate TIF). 22        (17) If the redevelopment project area was established 23    on December 23, 1986 by the City of Sparta to create TIF 24    #1. Any termination procedures provided for in Section 25    11-74.4-8 are not required for this redevelopment project 26    area prior to the 47th calendar year after the year in   SB0642 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    which the ordinance approving the redevelopment project 2    year was adopted. 3        (18) If the redevelopment project area was established 4    on March 30, 1992 by the Village of Ohio to create the 5    Village of Ohio TIF District.6        (19) If the redevelopment project area was established 7    on December 13, 1993 by the Village of Crete.8        (20) If the redevelopment project area was established 9    on February 12, 2001 by the Village of Crete.10        (21) If the redevelopment project area was established 11    on April 23, 2001 by the Village of Crete.12        (22) If the redevelopment project area was established 13    on December 29, 1993 by the City of Ottawa to create the 14    Ottawa I-80 North TIF District.15        (23) If the redevelopment project area was established 16    on September 20, 1994 by the City of Ottawa to create the 17    Ottawa Rt. 6 East TIF District.18        (24) If the redevelopment project area was established 19    on January 6, 1999 by the Village of Rosemont to create the 20    Village of Rosemont TIF 4 South River Road.21        (25) If the redevelopment project area was established 22    on December 20, 1988 by the Village of Lansing.23        (26) If the redevelopment project area was established 24    on November 20, 1989 by the Village of South Holland.25        (27) If the redevelopment project area was established 26    on December 11, 1989 by the Village of Melrose Park to   SB0642 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    create the Mid-Metros TIF. 2    (g) In consolidating the material relating to completion 3dates from Sections 11-74.4-3 and 11-74.4-7 into this Section, 4it is not the intent of the General Assembly to make any 5substantive change in the law, except for the extension of the 6completion dates for the City of Aurora, the Village of Milan, 7the City of West Frankfort, the Village of Libertyville, and 8the Village of Hoffman Estates set forth under items (67), 9(68), (69), (70), and (71) of subsection (c) of this Section. 10(Source: P.A. 102-117, eff. 7-23-21; 102-424, eff. 8-20-21; 11102-425, eff. 8-20-21; 102-446, eff. 8-20-21; 102-473, eff. 128-20-21; 102-627, eff. 8-27-21; 102-675, eff. 11-30-21; 13102-745, eff. 5-6-22; 102-818, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1113, eff. 1412-21-22; 103-315, eff. 7-28-23; 103-575, eff. 12-8-23; 15103-1016, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1058, eff. 12-31-24.) 16    Section 10. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 17Section 15-172, 21-25, and 21-385 as follows: 18    (35 ILCS 200/15-172)19    Sec. 15-172. Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze 20Homestead Exemption. 21    (a) This Section may be cited as the Low-Income Senior 22Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead Exemption.23    (b) As used in this Section:24    "Applicant" means an individual who has filed an   SB0642 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1application under this Section.2    "Base amount" means the base year equalized assessed value 3of the residence plus the first year's equalized assessed 4value of any added improvements which increased the assessed 5value of the residence after the base year.6    "Base year" means the taxable year prior to the taxable 7year for which the applicant first qualifies and applies for 8the exemption provided that in the prior taxable year the 9property was improved with a permanent structure that was 10occupied as a residence by the applicant who was liable for 11paying real property taxes on the property and who was either 12(i) an owner of record of the property or had legal or 13equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a written 14instrument or (ii) had a legal or equitable interest as a 15lessee in the parcel of property that was single family 16residence. If in any subsequent taxable year for which the 17applicant applies and qualifies for the exemption the 18equalized assessed value of the residence is less than the 19equalized assessed value in the existing base year (provided 20that such equalized assessed value is not based on an assessed 21value that results from a temporary irregularity in the 22property that reduces the assessed value for one or more 23taxable years), then that subsequent taxable year shall become 24the base year until a new base year is established under the 25terms of this paragraph. For taxable year 1999 only, the Chief 26County Assessment Officer shall review (i) all taxable years   SB0642 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1for which the applicant applied and qualified for the 2exemption and (ii) the existing base year. The assessment 3officer shall select as the new base year the year with the 4lowest equalized assessed value. An equalized assessed value 5that is based on an assessed value that results from a 6temporary irregularity in the property that reduces the 7assessed value for one or more taxable years shall not be 8considered the lowest equalized assessed value. The selected 9year shall be the base year for taxable year 1999 and 10thereafter until a new base year is established under the 11terms of this paragraph.12    "Chief County Assessment Officer" means the County 13Assessor or Supervisor of Assessments of the county in which 14the property is located.15    "Equalized assessed value" means the assessed value as 16equalized by the Illinois Department of Revenue.17    "Household" means the applicant, the spouse of the 18applicant, and all persons using the residence of the 19applicant as their principal place of residence.20    "Household income" means the combined income of the 21members of a household for the calendar year preceding the 22taxable year.23    "Income" has the same meaning as provided in Section 3.07 24of the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property 25Tax Relief Act, except that, beginning in assessment year 262001, "income" does not include veteran's benefits.  SB0642 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    "Internal Revenue Code of 1986" means the United States 2Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or any successor law or laws 3relating to federal income taxes in effect for the year 4preceding the taxable year.5    "Life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative" means 6a facility as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care Facilities 7Act.8    "Maximum income limitation" means:9        (1) $35,000 prior to taxable year 1999;10        (2) $40,000 in taxable years 1999 through 2003;11        (3) $45,000 in taxable years 2004 through 2005;12        (4) $50,000 in taxable years 2006 and 2007;13        (5) $55,000 in taxable years 2008 through 2016; 14        (6) for taxable year 2017, (i) $65,000 for qualified 15    property located in a county with 3,000,000 or more 16    inhabitants and (ii) $55,000 for qualified property 17    located in a county with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants; 18    and 19        (7) for taxable years 2018 through 2025 and 20    thereafter, $65,000 for all qualified property; . 21        (8) for taxable year 2026, $75,000 for all qualified 22    property;23        (9) for taxable year 2027, $77,000 for all qualified 24    property; and 25        (10) for taxable years 2028 and thereafter, $79,000 26    for all qualified property.   SB0642 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    As an alternative income valuation, a homeowner who is 2enrolled in any of the following programs may be presumed to 3have household income that does not exceed the maximum income 4limitation for that tax year as required by this Section: Aid 5to the Aged, Blind or Disabled (AABD) Program or the 6Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), both of 7which are administered by the Department of Human Services; 8the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP), which 9is administered by the Department of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity; The Benefit Access program, which is administered 11by the Department on Aging; and the Senior Citizens Real 12Estate Tax Deferral Program. 13    A chief county assessment officer may indicate that he or 14she has verified an applicant's income eligibility for this 15exemption but may not report which program or programs, if 16any, enroll the applicant. Release of personal information 17submitted pursuant to this Section shall be deemed an 18unwarranted invasion of personal privacy under the Freedom of 19Information Act. 20    "Residence" means the principal dwelling place and 21appurtenant structures used for residential purposes in this 22State occupied on January 1 of the taxable year by a household 23and so much of the surrounding land, constituting the parcel 24upon which the dwelling place is situated, as is used for 25residential purposes. If the Chief County Assessment Officer 26has established a specific legal description for a portion of   SB0642 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1property constituting the residence, then that portion of 2property shall be deemed the residence for the purposes of 3this Section.4    "Taxable year" means the calendar year during which ad 5valorem property taxes payable in the next succeeding year are 6levied.7    (c) Beginning in taxable year 1994, a low-income senior 8citizens assessment freeze homestead exemption is granted for 9real property that is improved with a permanent structure that 10is occupied as a residence by an applicant who (i) is 65 years 11of age or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household 12income that does not exceed the maximum income limitation, 13(iii) is liable for paying real property taxes on the 14property, and (iv) is an owner of record of the property or has 15a legal or equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a 16written instrument. This homestead exemption shall also apply 17to a leasehold interest in a parcel of property improved with a 18permanent structure that is a single family residence that is 19occupied as a residence by a person who (i) is 65 years of age 20or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household income 21that does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) has 22a legal or equitable ownership interest in the property as 23lessee, and (iv) is liable for the payment of real property 24taxes on that property. 25    In counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the amount 26of the exemption for all taxable years is the equalized   SB0642 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1assessed value of the residence in the taxable year for which 2application is made minus the base amount. In all other 3counties, the amount of the exemption is as follows: (i) 4through taxable year 2005 and for taxable year 2007 and 5thereafter, the amount of this exemption shall be the 6equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable year 7for which application is made minus the base amount; and (ii) 8for taxable year 2006, the amount of the exemption is as 9follows:10        (1) For an applicant who has a household income of 11    $45,000 or less, the amount of the exemption is the 12    equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable 13    year for which application is made minus the base amount.14        (2) For an applicant who has a household income 15    exceeding $45,000 but not exceeding $46,250, the amount of 16    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 17    residence in the taxable year for which application is 18    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.8.19        (3) For an applicant who has a household income 20    exceeding $46,250 but not exceeding $47,500, the amount of 21    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 22    residence in the taxable year for which application is 23    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.6.24        (4) For an applicant who has a household income 25    exceeding $47,500 but not exceeding $48,750, the amount of 26    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the   SB0642 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1    residence in the taxable year for which application is 2    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.4.3        (5) For an applicant who has a household income 4    exceeding $48,750 but not exceeding $50,000, the amount of 5    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 6    residence in the taxable year for which application is 7    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.2. 8    When the applicant is a surviving spouse of an applicant 9for a prior year for the same residence for which an exemption 10under this Section has been granted, the base year and base 11amount for that residence are the same as for the applicant for 12the prior year.13    Each year at the time the assessment books are certified 14to the County Clerk, the Board of Review or Board of Appeals 15shall give to the County Clerk a list of the assessed values of 16improvements on each parcel qualifying for this exemption that 17were added after the base year for this parcel and that 18increased the assessed value of the property.19    In the case of land improved with an apartment building 20owned and operated as a cooperative or a building that is a 21life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative, the 22maximum reduction from the equalized assessed value of the 23property is limited to the sum of the reductions calculated 24for each unit occupied as a residence by a person or persons 25(i) 65 years of age or older, (ii) with a household income that 26does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) who is   SB0642 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1liable, by contract with the owner or owners of record, for 2paying real property taxes on the property, and (iv) who is an 3owner of record of a legal or equitable interest in the 4cooperative apartment building, other than a leasehold 5interest. In the instance of a cooperative where a homestead 6exemption has been granted under this Section, the cooperative 7association or its management firm shall credit the savings 8resulting from that exemption only to the apportioned tax 9liability of the owner who qualified for the exemption. Any 10person who willfully refuses to credit that savings to an 11owner who qualifies for the exemption is guilty of a Class B 12misdemeanor.13    When a homestead exemption has been granted under this 14Section and an applicant then becomes a resident of a facility 15licensed under the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the 16Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental Health 17Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care Act, or 18the MC/DD Act, the exemption shall be granted in subsequent 19years so long as the residence (i) continues to be occupied by 20the qualified applicant's spouse or (ii) if remaining 21unoccupied, is still owned by the qualified applicant for the 22homestead exemption.23    Beginning January 1, 1997, when an individual dies who 24would have qualified for an exemption under this Section, and 25the surviving spouse does not independently qualify for this 26exemption because of age, the exemption under this Section   SB0642 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1shall be granted to the surviving spouse for the taxable year 2preceding and the taxable year of the death, provided that, 3except for age, the surviving spouse meets all other 4qualifications for the granting of this exemption for those 5years.6    When married persons maintain separate residences, the 7exemption provided for in this Section may be claimed by only 8one of such persons and for only one residence.9    For taxable year 1994 only, in counties having less than 103,000,000 inhabitants, to receive the exemption, a person 11shall submit an application by February 15, 1995 to the Chief 12County Assessment Officer of the county in which the property 13is located. In counties having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 14for taxable year 1994 and all subsequent taxable years, to 15receive the exemption, a person may submit an application to 16the Chief County Assessment Officer of the county in which the 17property is located during such period as may be specified by 18the Chief County Assessment Officer. The Chief County 19Assessment Officer in counties of 3,000,000 or more 20inhabitants shall annually give notice of the application 21period by mail or by publication. In counties having less than 223,000,000 inhabitants, beginning with taxable year 1995 and 23thereafter, to receive the exemption, a person shall submit an 24application by July 1 of each taxable year to the Chief County 25Assessment Officer of the county in which the property is 26located. A county may, by ordinance, establish a date for   SB0642 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1submission of applications that is different than July 1. The 2applicant shall submit with the application an affidavit of 3the applicant's total household income, age, marital status 4(and if married the name and address of the applicant's 5spouse, if known), and principal dwelling place of members of 6the household on January 1 of the taxable year. The Department 7shall establish, by rule, a method for verifying the accuracy 8of affidavits filed by applicants under this Section, and the 9Chief County Assessment Officer may conduct audits of any 10taxpayer claiming an exemption under this Section to verify 11that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the exemption. Each 12application shall contain or be verified by a written 13declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury. A 14taxpayer's signing a fraudulent application under this Act is 15perjury, as defined in Section 32-2 of the Criminal Code of 162012. The applications shall be clearly marked as applications 17for the Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead 18Exemption and must contain a notice that any taxpayer who 19receives the exemption is subject to an audit by the Chief 20County Assessment Officer.21    Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, in 22counties having fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an 23applicant fails to file the application required by this 24Section in a timely manner and this failure to file is due to a 25mental or physical condition sufficiently severe so as to 26render the applicant incapable of filing the application in a   SB0642 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1timely manner, the Chief County Assessment Officer may extend 2the filing deadline for a period of 30 days after the applicant 3regains the capability to file the application, but in no case 4may the filing deadline be extended beyond 3 months of the 5original filing deadline. In order to receive the extension 6provided in this paragraph, the applicant shall provide the 7Chief County Assessment Officer with a signed statement from 8the applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, 9or physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 10condition, that, in the physician's, advanced practice 11registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 12condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant 13incapable of filing the application in a timely manner, and 14the date on which the applicant regained the capability to 15file the application.16    Beginning January 1, 1998, notwithstanding any other 17provision to the contrary, in counties having fewer than 183,000,000 inhabitants, if an applicant fails to file the 19application required by this Section in a timely manner and 20this failure to file is due to a mental or physical condition 21sufficiently severe so as to render the applicant incapable of 22filing the application in a timely manner, the Chief County 23Assessment Officer may extend the filing deadline for a period 24of 3 months. In order to receive the extension provided in this 25paragraph, the applicant shall provide the Chief County 26Assessment Officer with a signed statement from the   SB0642 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or 2physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 3condition, and that, in the physician's, advanced practice 4registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 5condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant 6incapable of filing the application in a timely manner.7    In counties having less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an 8applicant was denied an exemption in taxable year 1994 and the 9denial occurred due to an error on the part of an assessment 10official, or his or her agent or employee, then beginning in 11taxable year 1997 the applicant's base year, for purposes of 12determining the amount of the exemption, shall be 1993 rather 13than 1994. In addition, in taxable year 1997, the applicant's 14exemption shall also include an amount equal to (i) the amount 15of any exemption denied to the applicant in taxable year 1995 16as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, as the base year, 17(ii) the amount of any exemption denied to the applicant in 18taxable year 1996 as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, 19as the base year, and (iii) the amount of the exemption 20erroneously denied for taxable year 1994.21    For purposes of this Section, a person who will be 65 years 22of age during the current taxable year shall be eligible to 23apply for the homestead exemption during that taxable year. 24Application shall be made during the application period in 25effect for the county of his or her residence. 26    The Chief County Assessment Officer may determine the   SB0642 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1eligibility of a life care facility that qualifies as a 2cooperative to receive the benefits provided by this Section 3by use of an affidavit, application, visual inspection, 4questionnaire, or other reasonable method in order to insure 5that the tax savings resulting from the exemption are credited 6by the management firm to the apportioned tax liability of 7each qualifying resident. The Chief County Assessment Officer 8may request reasonable proof that the management firm has so 9credited that exemption.10    Except as provided in this Section, all information 11received by the chief county assessment officer or the 12Department from applications filed under this Section, or from 13any investigation conducted under the provisions of this 14Section, shall be confidential, except for official purposes 15or pursuant to official procedures for collection of any State 16or local tax or enforcement of any civil or criminal penalty or 17sanction imposed by this Act or by any statute or ordinance 18imposing a State or local tax. Any person who divulges any such 19information in any manner, except in accordance with a proper 20judicial order, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.21    Nothing contained in this Section shall prevent the 22Director or chief county assessment officer from publishing or 23making available reasonable statistics concerning the 24operation of the exemption contained in this Section in which 25the contents of claims are grouped into aggregates in such a 26way that information contained in any individual claim shall   SB0642 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1not be disclosed.2    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for taxable 3year 2017 and thereafter, in counties of 3,000,000 or more 4inhabitants, the amount of the exemption shall be the greater 5of (i) the amount of the exemption otherwise calculated under 6this Section or (ii) $2,000. 7    (c-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 8chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 9the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property 10that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 11year, provided that: 12        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 13    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 14    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 15        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 16    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 17    as of January 1, 2019; 18        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 19    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 20    this Code; and 21        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 22    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020 23    taxable years. 24    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 25authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 26audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this   SB0642 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the 2exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 3    (c-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 4chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 5the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property 6that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 7year, if:8        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 9    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 10    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;11        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 12    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property 13    as of January 1, 2020;14        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 15    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 16    this Code; and17        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 18    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 19    taxable years.20    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 21authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 22audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this 23Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the 24exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 25    (d) Each Chief County Assessment Officer shall annually 26publish a notice of availability of the exemption provided   SB0642 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1under this Section. The notice shall be published at least 60 2days but no more than 75 days prior to the date on which the 3application must be submitted to the Chief County Assessment 4Officer of the county in which the property is located. The 5notice shall appear in a newspaper of general circulation in 6the county.7    Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 8Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 9implementation of any mandate created by this Section. 10(Source: P.A. 101-635, eff. 6-5-20; 102-136, eff. 7-23-21; 11102-895, eff. 5-23-22.) 12    (35 ILCS 200/21-25)13    Sec. 21-25. Due dates; accelerated billing in counties of 143,000,000 or more. Except as hereinafter provided and as 15provided in Section 21-40, in counties with 3,000,000 or more 16inhabitants in which the accelerated method of billing and 17paying taxes provided for in Section 21-30 is in effect, the 18estimated first installment of unpaid taxes shall be deemed 19delinquent and shall bear interest after March 1 and until 20paid or forfeited at the rate of (i) 1 1/2% per month or 21portion thereof if the unpaid taxes are for a tax year before 222023 or (ii) 0.75% per month, or portion thereof, if the unpaid 23taxes are for tax year 2023 or any tax year thereafter. For tax 24year 2010, the estimated first installment of unpaid taxes 25shall be deemed delinquent and shall bear interest after April   SB0642 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b11 at the rate of 1.5% per month or portion thereof until paid 2or forfeited. For tax year 2022, the estimated first 3installment of unpaid taxes shall be deemed delinquent and 4shall bear interest after April 1, 2023 at the rate of 1.5% per 5month or portion thereof until paid or forfeited. For tax year 62025, the estimated first installment of unpaid taxes shall be 7deemed delinquent and shall bear interest after April 1, 2026 8at the rate of 0.75% per month or portion thereof until paid or 9forfeited. For all tax years, the second installment of unpaid 10taxes shall be deemed delinquent and shall bear interest after 11August 1 annually at the same interest rate until paid or 12forfeited. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a 13taxpayer owes an arrearage of taxes due to an administrative 14error, and if the county collector sends a separate bill for 15that arrearage as provided in Section 14-41, then any part of 16the arrearage of taxes that remains unpaid on the day after the 17due date specified on that tax bill shall be deemed delinquent 18and shall bear interest after that date at the rate of (i) 1 191/2% per month, or portion thereof, if the unpaid taxes are for 20a tax year before 2023 or (ii) 0.75% per month, or portion 21thereof, if the unpaid taxes are for tax year 2023 or any tax 22year thereafter.23    If the county board elects by ordinance adopted prior to 24July 1 of a levy year to provide for taxes to be paid in 4 25installments, each installment for that levy year and each 26subsequent year shall be deemed delinquent and shall begin to   SB0642 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1bear interest 30 days after the date specified by the 2ordinance for mailing bills, at the rate of 1 1/2% per month, 3or portion thereof, until paid or forfeited. If the unpaid 4taxes are for a tax year before 2023, then interest shall 5accrue at the rate of 1.5% per month, or portion thereof, until 6paid or forfeited. If the unpaid taxes are for tax year 2023 or 7any tax year thereafter, then interest shall accrue at the 8rate of 0.75% per month, or portion thereof, until paid or 9forfeited. 10    Payment received by mail and postmarked on or before the 11required due date is not delinquent. 12    Taxes levied on homestead property in which a member of 13the National Guard or reserves of the armed forces of the 14United States who was called to active duty on or after August 151, 1990, and who has an ownership interest, shall not be deemed 16delinquent and no interest shall accrue or be charged as a 17penalty on such taxes due and payable in 1991 or 1992 until one 18year after that member returns to civilian status. 19    If an Illinois resident who is a member of the Illinois 20National Guard or a reserve component of the armed forces of 21the United States and who has an ownership interest in 22property taxed under this Act is called to active duty for 23deployment outside the continental United States and is on 24active duty on the due date of any installment of taxes due 25under this Act, he or she shall not be deemed delinquent in the 26payment of the installment and no interest shall accrue or be   SB0642 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1charged as a penalty on the installment until 180 days after 2that member returns to civilian status. To be deemed not 3delinquent in the payment of an installment of taxes and any 4interest on that installment, the reservist or guardsperson 5must make a reasonable effort to notify the county clerk and 6the county collector of his or her activation to active duty 7and must notify the county clerk and the county collector 8within 180 days after his or her deactivation and provide 9verification of the date of his or her deactivation. An 10installment of property taxes on the property of any reservist 11or guardsperson who fails to provide timely notice and 12verification of deactivation to the county clerk is subject to 13interest and penalties as delinquent taxes under this Code 14from the date of deactivation. 15(Source: P.A. 102-1112, eff. 12-21-22; 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 16    (35 ILCS 200/21-385)17    Sec. 21-385. Extension of period of redemption. 18    (a) For any tax certificates held by a county pursuant to 19Section 21-90, the redemption period for each tax certificate 20shall be extended by operation of law until the date 21established by the county as the redemption deadline in a 22petition for tax deed filed under Section 22-30. The 23redemption deadline established in the petition shall be 24identified in the notices provided under Sections 22-10 25through 22-25 of this Code. After a redemption deadline is   SB0642 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1established in the petition for tax deed, the county may 2further extend the redemption deadline by filing with the 3county clerk of the county in which the property is located a 4written notice to that effect describing the property, 5identifying the certificate number, and specifying the 6extended period of redemption. Notwithstanding any expiration 7of a prior redemption period, all tax certificates forfeited 8to the county and held pursuant to Section 21-90 shall remain 9enforceable by the county or its assignee, and redemption 10shall be extended by operation of law until the date 11established by the county as the redemption deadline in a 12petition for tax deed filed under Section 22-30. 13    (b) Within 60 days of the date of assignment, assignees of 14forfeited certificates under Section 21-90 or Section 21-145 15of this Code must file with the county clerk of the county in 16which the property is located a written notice describing the 17property, stating the date of the assignment, identifying the 18certificate number and specifying a deadline for redemption 19that is not later than 3 years from the date of assignment. 20Upon receiving the notice, the county clerk shall stamp the 21date of receipt upon the notice. If the notice is submitted as 22an electronic record, the county clerk shall acknowledge 23receipt of the record and shall provide confirmation in the 24same manner to the certificate holder. The confirmation from 25the county clerk shall include the date of receipt and shall 26serve as proof that the notice was filed with the county clerk.   SB0642 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1In no event shall a county clerk permit an assignee of 2forfeited certificates under Section 21-90 or Section 21-145 3of this Code to extend the period of redemption beyond 3 years 4from the date of assignment. If the redemption period expires 5and no petition for tax deed has been filed under Section 622-30, the assigned tax certificate shall be forfeited to and 7held by the county pursuant to Section 21-90. 8    (c) Except for the county as trustee pursuant to Section 921-90, the purchaser or his or her assignee of property sold 10for nonpayment of general taxes or special assessments may 11extend the period of redemption at any time before the 12expiration of the original period of redemption, or thereafter 13prior to the expiration of any extended period of redemption, 14but only for a period that will expire not later than 3 years 15from the date of sale, by filing with the county clerk of the 16county in which the property is located a written notice to 17that effect describing the property, stating the date of the 18sale and specifying the extended period of redemption. Upon 19receiving the notice, the county clerk shall stamp the date of 20receipt upon the notice. If the notice is submitted as an 21electronic record, the county clerk shall acknowledge receipt 22of the record and shall provide confirmation in the same 23manner to the certificate holder. The confirmation from the 24county clerk shall include the date of receipt and shall serve 25as proof that the notice was filed with the county clerk. The 26county clerk shall not be required to extend the period of   SB0642 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1redemption unless the purchaser or his or her assignee obtains 2this acknowledgement of delivery. If prior to the expiration 3of the period of redemption or extended period of redemption a 4petition for tax deed has been filed under Section 22-30, upon 5application of the petitioner, the court shall allow the 6purchaser or his or her assignee to extend the period of 7redemption after expiration of the original period or any 8extended period of redemption, provided that any extension 9allowed will expire not later than 3 years from the date of 10sale. If the period of redemption is extended, the purchaser 11or his or her assignee must give the notices provided for in 12Section 22-10 at the specified times prior to the expiration 13of the extended period of redemption by causing a sheriff (or 14if he or she is disqualified, a coroner) of the county in which 15the property, or any part thereof, is located to serve the 16notices as provided in Sections 22-15 and 22-20. The notices 17may also be served as provided in Sections 22-15 and 22-20 by a 18special process server appointed by the court under Section 1922-15 and as provided in Sections 22-15 and 22-20.20    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 21the 103rd General Assembly apply to matters concerning tax 22certificates issued on or after January 1, 2024. 23    (d) For any tax certificates held by a county, the county 24clerk may create and administer a payment plan during the 25redemption period. Under the payment plan, the county clerk 26may waive interest penalties when payments are made in   SB0642 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1accordance with the parameters set forth in the payment plan. 2(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 3    Section 15. The Senior Citizens Real Estate Tax Deferral 4Act is amended by changing Sections 2 and 3 as follows: 5    (320 ILCS 30/2)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 452)6    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    (a) "Qualified Taxpayer" means an individual (i) who will 8be 65 years of age or older by June 1 of the year for which a 9tax deferral is claimed; (ii) who certifies that they have 10owned and occupied as their residence such property or other 11qualifying property in the State for at least the last 3 years, 12except for any periods during which the taxpayer may have 13temporarily resided in a nursing or sheltered care home; and 14(iii) whose household income for the year is no greater than 15the maximum household income. : (i) $40,000 through tax year 162005; (ii) $50,000 for tax years 2006 through 2011; (iii) 17$55,000 for tax years 2012 through 2021; (iv) $65,000 for tax 18years 2022 through 2025; and (v) $55,000 for tax year 2026 and 19thereafter.20    (b) "Tax deferred property" means the property upon which 21real estate taxes are deferred under this Act.22    (c) "Homestead" means the land and buildings thereon, 23including a condominium or a dwelling unit in a multidwelling 24building that is owned and operated as a cooperative, occupied   SB0642 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1by the taxpayer as his residence or which are temporarily 2unoccupied by the taxpayer because such taxpayer is 3temporarily residing, for not more than 1 year, in a licensed 4facility as defined in Section 1-113 of the Nursing Home Care 5Act.6    (d) "Real estate taxes" or "taxes" means the taxes on real 7property for which the taxpayer would be liable under the 8Property Tax Code, including special service area taxes, and 9special assessments on benefited real property for which the 10taxpayer would be liable to a unit of local government.11    (e) "Department" means the Department of Revenue.12    (f) "Qualifying property" means a homestead which (a) the 13taxpayer or the taxpayer and his spouse own in fee simple or 14are purchasing in fee simple under a recorded instrument of 15sale, (b) is not income-producing property, (c) is not subject 16to a lien for unpaid real estate taxes when a claim under this 17Act is filed, and (d) is not held in trust, other than an 18Illinois land trust with the taxpayer identified as the sole 19beneficiary, if the taxpayer is filing for the program for the 20first time effective as of the January 1, 2011 assessment year 21or tax year 2012 and thereafter.22    (g) "Equity interest" means the current assessed valuation 23of the qualified property times the fraction necessary to 24convert that figure to full market value minus any outstanding 25debts or liens on that property. In the case of qualifying 26property not having a separate assessed valuation, the   SB0642 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1appraised value as determined by a qualified real estate 2appraiser shall be used instead of the current assessed 3valuation.4    (h) "Household income" has the meaning ascribed to that 5term in the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities 6Property Tax Relief Act.7    (i) "Collector" means the county collector or, if the 8taxes to be deferred are special assessments, an official 9designated by a unit of local government to collect special 10assessments.11    (j) "Maximum household income" means: 12        (1) $40,000 through tax year 2005; 13        (2) $50,000 for tax years 2006 through 2011; 14        (3) $55,000 for tax years 2012 through 2021; 15        (4) $65,000 for tax years 2022 through 2024; 16        (5) $75,000 for tax year 2025; 17        (6) $77,000 for tax year 2026; and 18        (7) $79,000 for tax years 2027 and thereafter. 19(Source: P.A. 102-644, eff. 8-27-21.) 20    (320 ILCS 30/3)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 453)21    Sec. 3. A taxpayer may, on or before March 1 of each year, 22apply to the county collector of the county where his 23qualifying property is located, or to the official designated 24by a unit of local government to collect special assessments 25on the qualifying property, as the case may be, for a deferral   SB0642 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1of all or a part of real estate taxes payable during that year 2for the preceding year in the case of real estate taxes other 3than special assessments, or for a deferral of any 4installments payable during that year in the case of special 5assessments, on all or part of his qualifying property. The 6application shall be on a form prescribed by the Department 7and furnished by the collector, (a) showing that the applicant 8will be 65 years of age or older by June 1 of the year for 9which a tax deferral is claimed, (b) describing the property 10and verifying that the property is qualifying property as 11defined in Section 2, (c) certifying that the taxpayer has 12owned and occupied as his residence such property or other 13qualifying property in the State for at least the last 3 years 14except for any periods during which the taxpayer may have 15temporarily resided in a nursing or sheltered care home, and 16(d) specifying whether the deferral is for all or a part of the 17taxes, and, if for a part, the amount of deferral applied for. 18As to qualifying property not having a separate assessed 19valuation, the taxpayer shall also file with the county 20collector a written appraisal of the property prepared by a 21qualified real estate appraiser together with a certificate 22signed by the appraiser stating that he has personally 23examined the property and setting forth the value of the land 24and the value of the buildings thereon occupied by the 25taxpayer as his residence. The county collector may use 26eligibility for the Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment   SB0642 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1Freeze Homestead Exemption under Section 15-172 of the 2Property Tax Code as qualification for items (a) and (c). 3    The collector shall grant the tax deferral provided such 4deferral does not exceed funds available in the Senior 5Citizens Real Estate Deferred Tax Revolving Fund and provided 6that the owner or owners of such real property have entered 7into a tax deferral and recovery agreement with the collector 8on behalf of the county or other unit of local government, 9which agreement expressly states:10    (1) That the total amount of taxes deferred under this 11Act, plus interest, for the year for which a tax deferral is 12claimed as well as for those previous years for which taxes are 13not delinquent and for which such deferral has been claimed 14may not exceed 80% of the taxpayer's equity interest in the 15property for which taxes are to be deferred and that, if the 16total deferred taxes plus interest equals 80% of the 17taxpayer's equity interest in the property, the taxpayer shall 18thereafter pay the annual interest due on such deferred taxes 19plus interest so that total deferred taxes plus interest will 20not exceed such 80% of the taxpayer's equity interest in the 21property. Effective as of the January 1, 2011 assessment year 22or tax year 2012 and through the 2021 tax year, and beginning 23again with the 2026 tax year, the total amount of any such 24deferral shall not exceed $5,000 per taxpayer in each tax 25year. For the 2022 tax year and every tax year after through 26the 2025 tax year, the total amount of any such deferral shall   SB0642 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1not exceed $7,500 per taxpayer in each tax year. 2    (2) That any real estate taxes deferred under this Act and 3any interest accrued thereon are a lien on the real estate and 4improvements thereon until paid. If the taxes deferred are for 5a tax year prior to 2023, then interest shall accrue at the 6rate of 6% per year. If the taxes deferred are for the 2023 tax 7year or any tax year thereafter, then interest shall accrue at 8the rate of 3% per year. No sale or transfer of such real 9property may be legally closed and recorded until the taxes 10which would otherwise have been due on the property, plus 11accrued interest, have been paid unless the collector 12certifies in writing that an arrangement for prompt payment of 13the amount due has been made with his office. The same shall 14apply if the property is to be made the subject of a contract 15of sale. 16    (3) That upon the death of the taxpayer claiming the 17deferral the heirs-at-law, assignees or legatees shall have 18first priority to the real property upon which taxes have been 19deferred by paying in full the total taxes which would 20otherwise have been due, plus interest. However, if such 21heir-at-law, assignee, or legatee is a surviving spouse, the 22tax deferred status of the property shall be continued during 23the life of that surviving spouse if the spouse is 55 years of 24age or older within 6 months of the date of death of the 25taxpayer and enters into a tax deferral and recovery agreement 26before the time when deferred taxes become due under this   SB0642 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1Section. Any additional taxes deferred, plus interest, on the 2real property under a tax deferral and recovery agreement 3signed by a surviving spouse shall be added to the taxes and 4interest which would otherwise have been due, and the payment 5of which has been postponed during the life of such surviving 6spouse, in determining the 80% equity requirement provided by 7this Section.8    (4) That if the taxes due, plus interest, are not paid by 9the heir-at-law, assignee or legatee or if payment is not 10postponed during the life of a surviving spouse, the deferred 11taxes and interest shall be recovered from the estate of the 12taxpayer within one year of the date of his death. In addition, 13deferred real estate taxes and any interest accrued thereon 14are due within 90 days after any tax deferred property ceases 15to be qualifying property as defined in Section 2.16    If payment is not made when required by this Section, 17foreclosure proceedings may be instituted under the Property 18Tax Code.19    (5) That any joint owner has given written prior approval 20for such agreement, which written approval shall be made a 21part of such agreement.22    (6) That a guardian for a person under legal disability 23appointed for a taxpayer who otherwise qualifies under this 24Act may act for the taxpayer in complying with this Act.25    (7) That a taxpayer or his agent has provided to the 26satisfaction of the collector, sufficient evidence that the   SB0642 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 06920 RTM 16956 b1qualifying property on which the taxes are to be deferred is 2insured against fire or casualty loss for at least the total 3amount of taxes which have been deferred.4    If the taxes to be deferred are special assessments, the 5unit of local government making the assessments shall forward 6a copy of the agreement entered into pursuant to this Section 7and the bills for such assessments to the county collector of 8the county in which the qualifying property is located.9(Source: P.A. 102-644, eff. 8-27-21; 102-895, eff. 5-23-22.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.